Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1106
Breaking, injuring, damaging, or interfering with pipeline, plant, or equipment; penalty.

Any person who shall willfully and maliciously break, injure, damage, or otherwise interfere with, any such pipeline, plant, or equipment of any such person, company, corporation, or association, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1963, c. 323, § 6, p. 981;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 60.